Florida, session 2026, HB149.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited the "Freedom 1: Property
Tax Relief Rollback for All Floridians Act."
Section 2. Section 200.1851, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
200.1851 Maximum millage rates for the 2027-2028 fiscal
year.—
(1) Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum county
millage rate that may be levied for the 2027-2028 fiscal year is
the rate which will provide the same ad valorem tax revenue for
the taxing authority as was levied during the 2022-2023 fiscal
year.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum school
millage rate that may be levied for the 2027-2028 fiscal year is
the rate which will provide the same ad valorem tax revenue for
the taxing authority as was levied during the 2022-2023 fiscal
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb149-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 149 2026
year.
(3) This section is repealed January 1, 2029.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb149-00